Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2382
Local hospital district; secretary-treasurer; duty.

It shall be the duty of the secretary-treasurer to use all reasonable and proper means to secure to the local hospital district the best terms for the depositing of the money belonging to the local hospital district consistent with the safekeeping and prompt payment of the funds of the local hospital district when demanded.

Laws 1994, LB 1118, § 14.